Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.515.010

Condensed compliance reports—Second-class districts.

Any compliance reporting requirements as a result of laws in this chapter that apply to second-class districts may be submitted in accordance with RCW 28A.330.250.

[ 2011 c 45 s 37.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 45: See note following RCW 28A.330.250.